Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2266.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 34-18 of the General Laws entitled "Residential Landlord and Tenant
Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
34-18-63. Determination of rent amount -- Use of algorithmic device prohibited.
(a) Definitions. For the purposes of this section:
(1) “Algorithmic device” means a device, software, tool, or model that uses one or more
computer-based algorithms, including machine learning or artificial intelligence, to perform
calculations concerning local or statewide rent amounts, occupancy trends, or other rental market
data for the primary purpose of advising, recommending, or determining the amount of rent a
landlord may charge, including adjustments to existing rent, that is not widely publicly accessible.
(2) “Nonpublic competitor data” means information that is derived from or about other
landlords, renters, occupancy, or pricing that is not widely available to the general public, including
but not limited to:
(i) Actual current rent prices for specific properties, units, or landlords collected from
nonpublic sources;
(ii) Occupancy rates, lease start/end data, or historical rental performance data obtained
from proprietary sources;
(iii) Data licensed or shared among participants in a competitive rental marketplace.
(3) “Rent” means the total consideration, fees, or charges a residential tenant is required to
pay for occupancy of a residential premises under any rental agreement, including concessions.

(b) Prohibition. Effective January 1, 2027, no landlord, property owner, property manager,
agent, or person acting on their behalf shall:
(1) Employ, use, knowingly rely upon, or cause another to employ, use, or rely upon an
algorithmic device that incorporates, uses, or was trained using nonpublic competitor data for the
purpose of determining, fixing, or suggesting the amount of rent to be charged to a residential
tenant; or
(2) Use an algorithmic device to determine any change in rent for a renewed lease term or
rent adjustment for an existing residential tenant.
(c) Exemptions. This section does not apply to:
(1) Rent or income limits established by federal, state, or local housing programs where
algorithmic tools are used solely to comply with program guidelines;
(2) Tools that produce only historical reporting of aggregate market data published no more
frequently than monthly, provided no individualized rent recommendations are made;
(3) Bona fide internal record-keeping or accounting systems that do not influence or set
rent amounts.
(d) Enforcement and remedies.
(1) Violations of this section shall be deemed an unfair or deceptive act or practice under
chapter 13.1 of title 6 ("deceptive trade practices").
(2) The Rhode Island attorney general, or any person aggrieved by a violation, may seek
relief including equitable relief and civil penalties, as appropriate, under § 6-13.1-5 et seq.
(3) The attorney general may promulgate regulations necessary for enforcement of this
section, including definitions, exemptions, recordkeeping requirements, and compliance processes.
(e) Severability. Should any provision of this section be held invalid, the remainder shall
remain in full force and effect.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004268
========
LC004268 - Page 2 of 3